Tennessee, session 114, SB0721.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-120-116(a), is amended by
deleting the language "provide a decision within ten (10) working days of receipt of the written
appeal" and substituting instead "provide a decision within fifteen (15) calendar days of receipt
of the written appeal".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0721
002872
- 1 -